Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1222.02
Director of Economic Development; fees; leases; collection; disposition.

(1) The Director of Economic Development is hereby authorized to set and collect a fee from persons who attend any attraction under the control or supervision of the Department of Economic Development. All such funds shall be deposited in the appropriate department fund and used for the purposes set forth for that fund.

(2) The Director of Economic Development may contract for and lease any property under the control and supervision of the Department of Economic Development to any person or organization if such lease is in the best interest of the state. All funds collected from such leases shall be deposited in the appropriate department fund and used for the purposes set forth for that fund.

Laws 1978, LB 568, § 22.